Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8808
Rules and regulations.

The director may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Health Insurance
Exchange Navigator Registration Act.

Laws 2013, LB568, § 8.